Hawaii statutes.
[§11-428] Eligibility requirements
for public funds. In order to be eligible to receive public funds for an
election, a candidate shall certify that the candidate will meet all the
following requirements:

(1) The candidate and any candidate committee authorized
by the candidate shall not incur campaign expenses in excess of the expenditure
limitations imposed by section 11-423;

(2) The candidate has qualified to be on the election
ballot in a primary or general election;

(3) The candidate has filed a statement of intent to
seek qualifying contributions. A contribution received before the filing of a
statement of intent to seek public funds shall not be considered a qualifying
contribution;

(4) The candidate or candidate committee authorized
by the candidate has received the minimum qualifying contribution amounts for
the office sought by the candidate as set forth in section 11-429;

(5) The aggregate of contributions certified with
respect to any person under paragraph (4) does not exceed $100;

(6) The candidate agrees to obtain and furnish any
evidence relating to expenditures that the commission may request;

(7) The candidate agrees to keep and furnish records,
books, and other information that the commission may request;

(8) The candidate agrees to an audit and examination
by the commission pursuant to section 11-434 and to pay any amounts required to
be paid pursuant to that section; and

(9) Each candidate and candidate committee in receipt
of qualifying contributions that may be taken into account for purposes of
public funding shall maintain, on a form prescribed by the commission, records that
show the date and amount of each qualifying contribution and the full name and
mailing address of the person making the contribution. The candidate and the candidate
committee authorized by the candidate shall transmit to the commission all
reports with respect to these contributions that the commission may require. [L
2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next